Utah, session 2026, HB172.
Section 1. Section 26B-7-411 is amended to read:26B-7-411. Exemptions to food service establishment requirements.(1)The following are not subject to the provisions of Section 26B-7-410:(a)special events sponsored by municipal or nonprofit civic organizations, including food booths at school sporting events and little league athletic events and church functions;(b)temporary event food services approved by a local health department;(c)vendors and other food service establishments that serve only commercially prepackaged foods and beverages as defined by the department by rule;(d)private homes not used as a commercial food service establishment;(e)health care facilities licensed under Chapter 2, Part 2, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection;(f)bed and breakfast establishments at which the only meal served is a continental breakfast as defined by the department by rule;(g)residential child care providers;(h)child care providers and programs licensed under Chapter 2, Part 4, Child Care Licensing;(i)back country food service establishments;(j)an event that is sponsored by a charitable organization, if, at the event, the organization:(i)provides food to a disadvantaged group free of charge; and(ii)complies with rules established by the department under Subsection (3)(4); and(k)a fundraising event hosted or sponsored by a nonprofit organization, as that term is defined in Section 16-6a-102, if:(i)a food service establishment donates the food for the fundraising event; and(ii)a certified food safety manager of the food service establishment remains on the site of the fundraising event; and(k)(l)a lowest risk or permitted food establishment category determined by a risk assessment evaluation established by the department by administrative rule adopted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.(2) If a food service establishment donates food to a nonprofit organization as described in Subsection (1)(k), the department may not require the food service establishment to obtain additional training, pay additional fees, or submit to additional testing for the purpose of donating, delivering, or serving food at the fundraising event.(2)(3)Nothing in this section may be construed as exempting a food service establishment described in Subsection (1) or (2) from any other applicable food safety laws of this state.(3)(4)The department may establish additional requirements, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for charitable organizations providing food for free under Subsection (1)(j).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 26B-7-412 is amended to read:26B-7-412. Certified food safety manager.(1)Before a person may manage a food service establishment as a certified food safety manager, that person shall submit documentation in the format prescribed by the department to the appropriate local health department indicating a passing score on a department-approved examination.(2)To continue to manage a food service establishment, a certified food safety manager shall:(a)successfully complete, every threefive years, renewal requirements established by department rule which are consistent with original certification requirements; and(b)submit documentation in the format prescribed by the department within 30 days of the completion of renewal requirements to the appropriate local health department.(3)A local health department may deny, revoke, or suspend the authority of a certified food safety manager to manage a food service establishment or require the completion of additional food safety training courses for any one of the following reasons:(a)submitting information required under Subsection (1) or (2) that is false, incomplete, or misleading;(b)repeated violations of department or local health department food safety rules; or(c)operating a food service establishment in a way that causes or creates a health hazard or otherwise threatens the public health, safety, or welfare.(4)A determination of a local health department made pursuant to Subsection (3) may be appealed by a certified food safety manager in the same manner provided for in Subsection 26B-7-410(4).(5)No person may use the title "certified food safety manager," or any other similar title, unless the person has satisfied the requirements of this section.(6)A local health department:(a)may not charge a fee to accept or process the documentation described in Subsections (1) and (2);(b)shall accept photocopies or electronic copies of the documentation described in Subsections (1) and (2); and(c)shall allow an individual to submit the documentation described in Subsections (1) and (2) by mail, email, or in person.(7)Certified food safety managers shall:(a)establish and monitor compliance with practices and procedures in the food service establishments where they are employed to maintain compliance with department and local health department food safety rules; and(b)perform such other duties that may be necessary to ensure food safety in the food service establishments where they are employed.(8)(a)The department shall establish by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:(i)statewide, uniform standards for certified food safety managers;(ii)criteria for food safety certification examinations; and(iii)any provisions necessary to implement this section.(b)The department shall approve food safety certification examinations in accordance with this section.(c)The local health department with jurisdiction over the geographic area in which a food service establishment is located shall enforce the provisions of this section.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.